Arkansas statutes. Title 25 State Government
Chapter 19

Freedom of Information Act of 1967

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2015, No. 186, § 1, provided:

“Legislative findings and intent.

“(a)The General Assembly finds that:

“(1)On April 3, 2014, in the case of Hopkins v. City of Brinkley, 2014 Ark. 139, 432 S.W.3d 609 (2014), the Supreme Court determined that neither the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, §25-19-101 et seq., nor federal law currently offers protection for the personal information of customers of municipally owned utility systems;

“(2)Amendments to the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, §25-19-101 et seq., in recent years have provided exceptions to disclosure for personal contact information of state, county, school, and municipal employees, but have provided no such protection for municipal utility customers;

“(3)The Arkansas Public Service Commission has traditionally and consistently protected the personal contact information of public utility customers by exercising its authority under §23-2-316(b), finding that the protection of such information is in the public interest;

“(4)Smart meters, which can record and transmit detailed data on a customer's use of a utility, present unique privacy concerns, as evidenced by a 2012 report of the United States Department of Energy on smart grid privacy that included recommendations that customer data be protected from release to third parties;

“(5)Recent amendments to the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, §25-19-101 et seq., have also provided disclosure exemptions for sensitive infrastructure information of public water systems;

“(6)The federal government recognizes the importance of critical infrastructure information, and has created special policies to address its protection, including without limitation:

“(A)The Critical Infrastructure Information Act of 2002, 6 U.S.C. § 131 et seq., which prohibits federal agencies from disclosing certain information submitted to the United States Department of Homeland Security; and

“(B)Rules of the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission addressing critical energy infrastructure information, which limit access to certain information generated or collected by the commission and require the use of nondisclosure agreements when the information is provided; and

“(7)It is necessary to protect the security of the infrastructure of Arkansas's utility systems, including without limitation electric generation, transmission, and distribution.

“(b)It is the intent of this act to:

“(1)Protect the privacy of Arkansas citizens by exempting from disclosure the personal information of customers of municipally owned utility systems; and

“(2)Ensure the security of Arkansas's infrastructure by exempting utility infrastructure information from mandatory disclosure.”

Acts 2017, No. 1107, § 1, provided: “Legislative findings and intent.

“(a)The General Assembly finds that:

“(1)It is vital to a democratic society that public business be performed in an open and public manner so that the electors are advised of the performance of public officials and of the decisions that are reached in public activity and in making public policy;

“(2)Under the current law, state agencies, boards, and commissions must prepare and make available on the internet certain information, free of charge;

“(3)Upon the state agency, board, or commission providing the information on the internet, the information provided is deemed a sufficient response to a request to inspect the materials, unless the requestor specifies another medium or format under §25-19-105;

“(4)The provisions of §25-19-105, while ensuring transparency, have the added benefit of diminishing compliance costs associated with large, complicated, and frequent requests for public records, as the state agency, board, or commission is deemed compliant by providing the legally specified information on the internet;

“(5)However, the current law does not afford local governments, including their boards and instrumentalities, the ability to increase transparency and efficiency by the means available to state agencies, boards, and commissions;

“(6)Local governments often receive large, complicated, and frequent requests for public records, requiring additional staff and resources to which the local government must dedicate its limited resources;

“(7)Local governments should have the discretion to make all or part of the information listed under §25-19-105 available on the internet and, upon publication, be deemed in compliance with the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, §25-19-101 et seq., for those records; and

“(8)While not every local government has the resources to comply with all or part of the provisions included under §25-19-105, allowing local governments the option to comply with all or part of the provisions under §25-19-105, and be deemed compliant concerning those records, would allow local governments to be more effective stewards of taxpayer dollars.

“(b)It is the intent of the General Assembly to allow local governments the opportunity to be more transparent, while reducing the burden on local governments' limited resources, thereby reducing the financial cost to taxpayers of additional staff and other resources.

“(c)It is not the intent of the General Assembly to:

“(1)Allow the custodian or government entity to act in bad faith to avoid transparency; or

“(2)Place an unreasonable burden on local governments.”

Cross References. Records of, and testimony before, committees reviewing and evaluating quality of medical or hospital care, §16-46-105.

Effective Dates. Acts 1967, No. 93, § 10: Feb. 14, 1967. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the proper functioning of a democratic society is dependent upon the public being informed at all times with respect to the operations of government, and public officials shall at all times be held accountable for their public actions and conduct; that this state does not now have a law requiring that all public records be open to the public, except in those instances where otherwise specifically provided by law; that many agencies are now holding executive or closed sessions which is contrary to the spirit of the public business being transacted in open public meetings, and that the immediate passage of this act is necessary to correct said situations and to secure to the public their proper right of access to public records and meetings of public agencies, boards, and commissions. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1201, § 3: Feb 11, 1976. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the provisions of Section 5 of Act 93 of 1967 relating to executive sessions of public bodies, as this Section is now written and has been interpreted by certain courts in the State, is very confusing and does not serve as a reliable guideline to public bodies regarding executive sessions; that it is essential to the proper administration of government and public education that the law relating to executive sessions and those who may be present at executive sessions be clarified in order to permit administrative and supervisory personnel to be present at an executive session when personnel matters are being considered; that it is essential to secure and maintain the essential legal rights of various public bodies that such bodies be permitted to hold executive sessions with their attorneys when such body or bodies are parties to litigation pending in the courts; that the law should be clarified further to specifically authorize public school boards to hold executive sessions for the purpose of considering matters involving student discipline if the student or the parent involved so requests; that this Act is designed to clarify the law with respect to executive sessions in the areas described above and should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1977, No. 652, § 4: Mar. 23, 1977. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the laws of this state are unclear as to the kinds of records which are subject to inspection and copying by citizens and that a clarification will promote the public policy of the State of Arkansas that public business is to be performed in an open and public manner. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1981, No. 608, § 3: July 1, 1981.

Acts 1985, No. 843, § 3: Apr. 4, 1985. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the provisions of the Freedom of Information Act require notice of emergency on special meetings of school boards to be given only to those newspapers located in the county in which the meeting is to be held; that in some instances the principal newspaper serving the patrons of the district is printed outside the county in which the district is located; that it is essential to the effective and efficient administration of each school district that notice of such meetings be given to the principal newspaper serving the patrons of the district when the newspaper requests such notice; that this Act requires such notice and should be given effect at the earliest practical date. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1987, No. 49, § 5: Feb. 16, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that considerable confusion has existed regarding public access to personnel records and employee evaluation records under Act 93 of 1967, as amended; that Act 17 of 1986, Second Extraordinary Session, which exempts employee evaluation records from disclosure, by its own terms ceases to be effective on April 1, 1987; that, as a general matter, the confidentiality of personnel records and employee evaluation records is in the public interest to ensure the privacy of employees and the efficacy of the employee evaluation process; that such records should, however, be open to public inspection in certain circumstances; that guidance from the Attorney General and additional enforcement mechanisms, including attorney fees, litigation costs, and criminal penalties, are necessary to implement the provisions of this Act regarding such records; and that this Act is designed to clarify the law with respect to such records and should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1987, No. 1001, § 3: Apr. 14, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that because of the case Ricarte v. State, CR 86-31, a question has arisen over the validity of Act 1201 of the Extended Session of 1976; that this Act is a reenactment of the former law; and that the immediate passage of this Act is necessary to clarify the state of the law on this issue. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1989 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 8, § 4: Nov. 1, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that present law is unclear concerning the confidentiality of the records obtained by the Arkansas Industrial Development Commission in the recruitment of industry to this State, and the disclosure of such information under the provisions of the Freedom of Information Act would seriously jeopardize other recruitment efforts of the Commission, since this information is given to the Commission under an agreement of confidentiality. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2001, No. 1653, § 5: Apr. 16, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly that confusion exists as to the status of electronic records under the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, as amended; that the right to obtain copies of public records at a reasonable cost is uncertain; that access to certain electronic records may adversely affect the security of computer systems and networks maintained by public entities; and that access to certain student records maintained in electronic form by school districts, institutions of higher education, and state agencies may jeopardize federal funding. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2003, No. 275, § 3: Feb. 28, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that for many years, veterans were advised to file their military service discharge records or DD Form 214 with the court recorder; that these forms contain sensitive information that can be used by identity thieves to obtain credit in the veteran's name or otherwise defraud the veteran or his or her family; in recent years, the incident of identity theft has increased; that incidents of identity thieves using the military service discharge records or DD Form 214 to obtain credit in the veteran's name or otherwise defraud the veteran or his or her family has occurred; that the effects on the veteran and the veteran's family are devastating; and that this act is immediately necessary to protect veterans and their families from identity theft by making military service discharge records or DD Form 214 filed with the county recorder confidential and not subject to the Arkansas Freedom of Information Act. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2003, No. 763, § 4: Mar. 27, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that safe and secure water systems are vital to the health and well being of the citizens of this state; that information concerning the safety and security of public water systems subject to disclosure under the Arkansas Freedom of Information Act could be obtained for terroristic purposes, including contamination and destruction of public water systems; and that this act is immediately necessary to deter these acts, and to protect the security of public water systems. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2003, No. 1214, § 2: Apr. 10, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain records of law abiding citizens of this state need further protection from disclosure; that this act provides that protection; and that until this act goes into effect, the law abiding citizens of this state will remain in danger of information being disclosed which is contrary to their best interests. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2005, No. 259, § 4: July 1, 2005. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that provisions in the Freedom of Information Act concerning records and meetings of public water systems will expire on July 1, 2005; that the continued ability of the public to access records of public water systems is necessary in order to ensure that public water systems are operated and managed safely and effectively; and that this act is immediately necessary in order to provide continuous access to the records. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2005.”

Acts 2007, No. 268, § 4: Mar. 9, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that safe and secure public water systems are vital to the health and public well-being of the citizens of this state; that information pertaining to the vulnerability assessments presently subject to disclosure under the Arkansas Freedom of Information Act could be obtained for domestic or foreign terroristic purposes, including the contamination and destruction of public water systems; and that the threat of acts of terrorism against public water systems is legitimate and real. To deter such acts, and to protect the security of public water systems, the Arkansas Freedom of Information Act should be amended immediately to exempt vulnerability assessments created on or before June 30, 2004, from disclosure. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2007, No. 998, § 4: July 1, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain provisions in the Freedom of Information Act concerning the records and meetings of public water systems will expire on July 1, 2007; that those provisions are necessary to ensure that public water systems are operated and managed safely and effectively; and that this act is necessary in order to provide security for public water systems. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2007.”

Acts 2009, No. 631, § 4: July 1, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain provisions in the Freedom of Information Act concerning the records and meetings of the public water systems will expire on July 1, 2009; that those provisions are necessary to ensure that public water systems are operated and managed safely and effectively; and that this act is necessary to provide security for public water systems. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2009.”

Acts 2009, No. 1291, § 2: Apr. 9, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the identities of persons holding concealed weapons licenses should be private; that there are currently insufficient safeguards ensuring that privacy; and that this act is immediately necessary because persons holding concealed weapons licenses are currently at risk of having that privacy exploited. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2011, No. 99, §4: July 1, 2011. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain provisions of the Freedom of Information Act of 1967 concerning the records and meetings of public water systems will expire on July 1, 2011; that those provisions are necessary to ensure that public water systems are operated and managed safely and effectively; and that this act is necessary to provide security for public water systems. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on and after July 1, 2011.”

Acts 2013, No. 145, § 2: Feb. 22, 2013. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the release of records to the general public concerning persons licensed to carry a concealed handgun is an unwarranted invasion of privacy and threatens the safety and property of the persons identified; and that this act is immediately necessary to prevent harm to citizens and safeguard their property. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2015, No. 186, § 5: Feb. 24, 2015. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the public availability of certain information held by municipally owned utility systems jeopardizes the security of the utility system and of the citizens that receive services from the system; and that this act should become effective as soon as possible to safeguard utility services that are critical to Arkansas communities. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2015, No. 999, § 5: Apr. 2, 2015. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the retention of certain public records such as campaign contribution reports and statements of financial interest filed by public officials warrants recognition, promotion, and protection by this state; that it is of vital importance that the state immediately designates an official custodian of these records so that the public can be assured that a designated state office will keep the records; and that this act is immediately necessary to ensure that the records will be available for immediate inspection. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2017, No. 711, § 14: Mar. 27, 2017. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, §25-19-101 et seq., places undue restrictions on water systems; that, in order to satisfy such restrictions, a water system must forego certain undertakings to the detriment of the water system and its customers; and that this act is immediately necessary so that a water system may provide information to its utility partners, other government offices, and certain members of the public in order for the water system to serve its community as efficiently and effectively as possible. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2017, No. 1107, § 4: Apr. 7, 2017. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that government entities are being overwhelmed by voluminous requests for production of public records under the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, §25-19-101 et seq.; that timely compliance with such requests comes at a great expense to the taxpayers; and that this act is immediately necessary to protect custodians and government entities from criminal and civil liability for violations of the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, §25-19-101 et seq., that cannot be prevented by their good faith efforts to comply. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

Acts 2020, No. 2, § 84: July 1, 2020, except §§ 38-43, effective Apr. 16, 2020. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2020 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided; with the exception that Sections 38-43 in this Act shall be in full force and effect from and after the date of its passage and approval, and that in the event of an extension of the Legislative Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2020, with the exception that Sections 38-43 in this Act shall be in full force and effect from and after the date of its passage and approval, could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2020; with the exception that Sections 38-43 in this Act shall be in full force and effect from and after the date of its passage and approval”.

25-19-101. Title.

This chapter shall be known and cited as the “Freedom of Information Act of 1967”.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 93, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2801.

Cross References. Purpose of Legislative Joint Auditing Committee, §10-3-402.

25-19-102. Legislative intent.

It is vital in a democratic society that public business be performed in an open and public manner so that the electors shall be advised of the performance of public officials and of the decisions that are reached in public activity and in making public policy. Toward this end, this chapter is adopted, making it possible for them or their representatives to learn and to report fully the activities of their public officials.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 93, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2802.